src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
! ---------------
!! The HUNGARIAN language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON N_HANG__n
! N_jaje
+N:%{back%}  NMN_HANG/ESET ;

LEXICON N_ESET__n
! N_jaje
+N:%{front%}  NMN_HANG/ESET ;

LEXICON NMN_HANG/ESET
!+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>j%{aeáé%} # ;
!+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:%>j%{aeáé%}%^V2VV%>t # ;

R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%>%{eoö%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%>%{eoö%}t # ;
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/jA/Unk/OtOk/jUk ;
!+Sg@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/jA/Unk/OtOk/jUk ;
+Pl:%>j%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_MAGYAR__n
! N_jaje
+N:%{back%} NMN_MAGYAR/SZITTER ;
LEXICON N_SZITTER__n
! N_jaje
+N:%{front%} NMN_MAGYAR/SZITTER ;

LEXICON NMN_MAGYAR/SZITTER
R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%>%{eoö%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%>t # ;
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/jA/Unk/OtOk/jUk ;
+Pl:%>j%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;


LEXICON N_MACSKA__n
! N_jaje
+N:%{back%} NMN_MACSKA/BÉKE ;
LEXICON N_BÉKE__n
! N_jaje
+N:%{front%} NMN_MACSKA/BÉKE ;

LEXICON NMN_MACSKA/BÉKE
R ;
+Sg:%^V2VV ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%^V2VV%>k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%^V2VV%>t # ;
+Sg:%^V2VV NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/jA/nk/tOk/jUk ;
+Pl:%^V2VV%>j%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_ADÁS__n
! N_ae
+N:%{back%} NMN_ADÁS/ESÉS ;

LEXICON N_ESÉS__n
! N_ae
+N:%{front%} NMN_ADÁS/ESÉS ;
LEXICON NMN_ADÁS/ESÉS
R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%>%{eoö%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%>%{eoö%}t # ;
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/A/Unk/OtOk/Uk ;
+Pl:%>%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_ADÓ__n
! N_jaje
+N:%{back%} NMN_ADÓ/ESŐ ;
LEXICON N_ESŐ__n
! N_jaje
+N:%{front%} NMN_ADÓ/ESŐ ;
R ;
LEXICON NMN_ADÓ/ESŐ
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%>k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%>t # ;
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/jA/nk/tOk/jUk ;
+Pl:%>i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;


LEXICON N_SÖR__n
! N_ae
+N:%{front%} NMN_XX/SÖR ;

LEXICON NMN_XX/SÖR
R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%>%{eoö%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Pl+Acc:%>%{eoö%}k%>et # ;
+Sg+Acc:%>t # ;
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/A/Unk/OtOk/Uk ;
+Pl:%>%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_FÖLD__n
! N_oe Sg3 jAE  
+N:%{front%} NMN_XX/FÖLD ;

LEXICON NMN_XX/FÖLD
R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%>%{ae%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%>%{ae%}t # ; ! forradalmat
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Am/Ad/jA/Unk/AtOk/jUk ;
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_jA/jUk ;
+Pl:%>j%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_FÜL__n
! N_oe   
+N:%{front%} NMN_XX/FÜL ;

LEXICON NMN_XX/FÜL
R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%>%{ae%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%>%{ae%}t # ; ! forradalmat
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Am/Ad/A/Unk/AtOk/Uk ;
+Pl:%>%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_EPENTH-PL_ak
! N_ae, e.g. tartalom
+N:%{back%} NMN_EPENTH-PL_Ak ;

LEXICON N_EPENTH-PL_ek
! N_ae, e.g. értelem 
+N:%{front%} NMN_EPENTH-PL_Ak ;

LEXICON NMN_EPENTH-PL_Ak
R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%^Pen%^RmVow%>%{ae%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%^Pen%^RmVow%>%{ae%}t # ; ! forradalmat
+Sg:%^Pen%^RmVow NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Am/Ad/A/Unk/AtOk/Uk ;
+Pl:%^Pen%^RmVow%>%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_ÚT__n
! N_, 
+N:%{back%} NMN_ÚT/XX ;

LEXICON NMN_ÚT/XX
R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%^Pen%^VV2V%>%{ae%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%^Pen%^VV2V%>%{ae%}t # ; ! forradalmat
+Sg:%^Pen%^VV2V NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Am/Ad/Unk/AtOk ;
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_jA/jUk ;
+Pl:%>j%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_TŰZ__n
! N_oe,  
+N:%{front%} NMN_XX/TŰZ ;

LEXICON NMN_XX/TŰZ
R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%^Pen%^VV2V%>%{ae%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%^Pen%^VV2V%>%{ae%}t # ; ! forradalmat
+Sg:%^Pen%^VV2V NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Am/Ad/A/Unk/AtOk/Uk ;
+Pl:%^Pen%^VV2V%>%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;

LEXICON N_EPENTH-PL_ok
! N_ae, e.g. 
+N:%{back%} NMN_EPENTH-PL_Ok ;

LEXICON N_EPENTH-PL_ök
! N_ae, e.g. 
+N:%{front%} NMN_EPENTH-PL_Ok ;

LEXICON NMN_EPENTH-PL_Ok
! , kölyök
R ;
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%^Pen%^RmVow%>%{ae%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%^Pen%^RmVow%>%{ae%}t # ; ! forradalmat
+Sg:%^Pen%^RmVow%>%{ae%} NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/ZERO/nk/tOk/Uk ;
+Pl:%^Pen%^RmVow%>%{ae%}i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;


LEXICON N_TETŐ__n !!= * @CODE@ tetején
! N_jaje
+N:%{front%} NMN_XX/TETŐ ;
R ;
LEXICON NMN_XX/TETŐ
+Sg: ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS ;
+Pl:%>k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
+Sg+Acc:%>t # ;
+Sg: NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/jA/nk/tOk/jUk ;
+Pl:%>i NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_ ;




LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/jA/Unk/OtOk/jUk
PXSG1_Om ;
PXSG2_Od ;
PXSG3_jA ;
PXPL1_Unk ;
PXPL2_OtOk ;
PXPL3_jUk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/jA/nk/tOk/jUk
PXSG1_m ;
PXSG2_d ;
PXSG3_jA ;
PXPL1_nk ;
PXPL2_tOk ;
PXPL3_jUk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Om/Od/A/Unk/OtOk/Uk
PXSG1_Om ;
PXSG2_Od ;
PXSG3_A ;
PXPL1_Unk ;
PXPL2_OtOk ;
PXPL3_Uk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/ZERO/nk/tOk/Uk
PXSG1_m ;
PXSG2_d ;
PXSG3_ZERO ;
PXPL1_nk ;
PXPL2_tOk ;
PXPL3_Uk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Am/Ad/A/Unk/AtOk/Uk
PXSG1_Am ;
PXSG2_Ad ;
PXSG3_A ;
PXPL1_Unk ;
PXPL2_AtOk ;
PXPL3_Uk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Am/Ad/jA/Unk/AtOk/jUk
PXSG1_Am ;
PXSG2_Ad ;
PXSG3_jA ;
PXPL1_Unk ;
PXPL2_AtOk ;
PXPL3_jUk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_Am/Ad/Unk/AtOk
PXSG1_Am ;
PXSG2_Ad ;
PXPL1_Unk ;
PXPL2_AtOk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_m/d/nk/tOk
PXSG1_m ;
PXSG2_d ;
PXPL1_nk ;
PXPL2_tOk ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-SG_jA/jUk
PXSG3_jA ;
PXPL3_jUk ;




LEXICON PXSG1_m
@U.PX.SG1@:@U.PX.SG1@%>m ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG1_Am
@U.PX.SG1@:@U.PX.SG1@%>%{ae%}m ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG1_Om
@U.PX.SG1@:@U.PX.SG1@%>%{eoö%}m ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
!000@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2m@U.PX.SG1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG2_d
@U.PX.SG2@:@U.PX.SG2@%>d ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG2_Ad
@U.PX.SG2@:@U.PX.SG2@%>%{ae%}d ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG2_Od
@U.PX.SG2@:@U.PX.SG2@%>%{eoö%}d ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
!000@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2d@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG3_ZERO
@U.PX.SG3@:@U.PX.SG3@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3-PL ;

LEXICON PXSG3_jA
@U.PX.SG3@:@U.PX.SG3@%>j%{aeáé%} ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3-SG ;

!0000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ja%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3 ;
!0000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>je%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3 ;

LEXICON PXSG3_A
@U.PX.SG3@:@U.PX.SG3@%>%{aeáé%} ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3-SG ;
!0000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>e%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-PXSG3 ;

LEXICON PXPL1_nk
@U.PX.PL1@:@U.PX.PL1@%>nk ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL1_Unk
@U.PX.PL1@:@U.PX.PL1@%>%{uü%}nk ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
!0000@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ünk@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL2_tOk
@U.PX.PL2@:@U.PX.PL2@%>t%{eoö%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
!0000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>t%^Ö2k@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL2_AtOk
@U.PX.PL2@:@U.PX.PL2@%>%{ae%}t%{eoö%}k ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
