src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
árnyalat:árnyalat N_HANG__n ;
bálna:bálna N_MACSKA__n ;
beeresztés:beeresztés N_ESÉS__n ;
békegazdálkodás:békegazdálkodás N_ADÁS__n ;
bombázó:bombázó N_ADÓ__n ;
bon:bon N_MAGYAR__n ;
bortermés:bortermés N_ESÉS__n ;
cicamaca:cicamaca N_MACSKA__n ;
csavarulat:csavarulat N_HANG__n ;
csemete:csemete N_BÉKE__n ;
diákotthon:diákotthon N_MAGYAR__n ;
disztinkció:disztinkció N_ADÓ__n ;
drótkötélpálya:drótkötélpálya N_MACSKA__n ;
elbúcsúzás:elbúcsúzás N_ADÁS__n ;
elme:elme N_BÉKE__n ;
előkészítés:előkészítés N_ESÉS__n ;
eset:eset N_ESET__n ;
fajirtás:fajirtás N_ADÁS__n ;
felüdülés:felüdülés N_ESÉS__n ;
fene:fene N_BÉKE__n ;
fényképfixáló:fényképfixáló N_ADÓ__n ;
filippika:filippika N_MACSKA__n ;
fogazat:fogazat N_HANG__n ;
folytatás:folytatás N_ADÁS__n ;
garnizon:garnizon N_MAGYAR__n ;
golyva:golyva N_MACSKA__n ;
hadihajó:hadihajó N_ADÓ__n ;
hántolóeke:hántolóeke N_BÉKE__n ;
hordár:hordár N_MAGYAR__n ;
hossztalpfa:hossztalpfa N_MACSKA__n ;
időváltozás:időváltozás N_ADÁS__n ;
ínyencfalat:ínyencfalat N_HANG__n ;
író:író N_ADÓ__n ;
káplár:káplár N_MAGYAR__n ;
kártyavetés:kártyavetés N_ESÉS__n ;
kemence:kemence N_BÉKE__n ;
kikapcsolás:kikapcsolás N_ADÁS__n ;
konstrukció:konstrukció N_ADÓ__n ;
korpa:korpa N_MACSKA__n ;
kőzápor:kőzápor N_MAGYAR__n ;
közbevetés:közbevetés N_ESÉS__n ;
kútforrás:kútforrás N_ADÁS__n ;
lapkivágat:lapkivágat N_HANG__n ;
levente:levente N_BÉKE__n ;
megalázkodó:megalázkodó N_ADÓ__n ;
megalvadás:megalvadás N_ADÁS__n ;
megkeményedés:megkeményedés N_ESÉS__n ;
moha:moha N_MACSKA__n ;
nézőke:nézőke N_BÉKE__n ;
otthon:otthon N_MAGYAR__n ;
öregedés:öregedés N_ESÉS__n ;
összeforradás:összeforradás N_ADÁS__n ;
összeszorító:összeszorító N_ADÓ__n ;
párnázat:párnázat N_HANG__n ;
pneumatika:pneumatika N_MACSKA__n ;
pókféle:pókféle N_BÉKE__n ;
sikátor:sikátor N_MAGYAR__n ;
sörte:sörte N_BÉKE__n ;
szélrózsa:szélrózsa N_MACSKA__n ;
szenzáció:szenzáció N_ADÓ__n ;
szétterjedés:szétterjedés N_ESÉS__n ;
szújárat:szújárat N_HANG__n ;
tárcsás:tárcsás N_ADÁS__n ;
terhe:terhe N_BÉKE__n ;
torzó:torzó N_ADÓ__n ;
ütőkártya:ütőkártya N_MACSKA__n ;
ventilátor:ventilátor N_MAGYAR__n ;
vese:vese N_BÉKE__n ;
visszaszerzés:visszaszerzés N_ESÉS__n ;
vízió:vízió N_ADÓ__n ;
vizsgadolgozat:vizsgadolgozat N_HANG__n ;
mézsör:mézsör N_SÖR__n ;
sör:sör N_SÖR__n ;
gyapjúhulladék:gyapjúhulladék N_HANG__n ;
inzulin:inzulin N_MAGYAR__n ;
mozaik:mozaik N_HANG__n ;
választék:választék N_HANG__n ;
zsanér:zsanér N_MAGYAR__n ;
föld:föld N_FÖLD__n ;
fül:fül N_FÜL__n ;
mérföld:mérföld N_FÖLD__n ;
rizsföld:rizsföld N_FÖLD__n ;
szántóföld:szántóföld N_FÖLD__n ;
szárazföld:szárazföld N_FÖLD__n ;
szülőföld:szülőföld N_FÖLD__n ;
televényföld:televényföld N_FÖLD__n ;
termőföld:termőföld N_FÖLD__n ;
timföld:timföld N_FÖLD__n ;
tűz:tűz N_TŰZ__n ;
árok:árok N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
bátor:bátor N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
birkaakol:birkaakol N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
bögöly:bögöly N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
bütyök:bütyök N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
cserekereskedelem:cserekereskedelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
csokor:csokor N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
diadalom:diadalom N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
értelem:értelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
farkaskölyök:farkaskölyök N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
fátyol:fátyol N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
figyelem:figyelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
fogoly:fogoly N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
gyászfátyol:gyászfátyol N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
hittitok:hittitok N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
homokgödör:homokgödör N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
irodalom:irodalom N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
kartonvászon:kartonvászon N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
kérelem:kérelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
kőhalom:kőhalom N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
környezetvédelem:környezetvédelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
köröm:köröm N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
külsérelem:külsérelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
mogyoróbokor:mogyoróbokor N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
mozivászon:mozivászon N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
ököl:ököl N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
parancsuralom:parancsuralom N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
pöcök:pöcök N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
ruhakapocs:ruhakapocs N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
sejtelem:sejtelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
szemtükör:szemtükör N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
szerelem:szerelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
szesztilalom:szesztilalom N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
szívburok:szívburok N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
természetvédelem:természetvédelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
tücsök:tücsök N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
üszök:üszök N_EPENTH-PL_ök ;
vadászsólyom:vadászsólyom N_EPENTH-PL_ok ;
védelem:védelem N_EPENTH-PL_ek ;
vigalom:vigalom N_EPENTH-PL_ak ;
